src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-xadasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScDu3: хаданахаюнаць
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScDu3: хаданахаюдаць
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScDu3: хаданахаюдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданин
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданид
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданида
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданиниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданинаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданидаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: хаданидоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданинась
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданидась
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданидась
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданининзь
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданидинзь
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданидинзь
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданинаць
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданидаць
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданидонзь
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Tra: хаданаӈэ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Car: хаданасиˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Equ: хаданадремʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Equ+Lat: хаданадревʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хадавы
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+Abs: хадавымʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+Abs: хадавыʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+Abs: хадавэнʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+Abs: хадавэхэна
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+Abs: хадавэхэд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+Abs: хадавэвна
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+Abs: хадавэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+Abs: хадавэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+Abs: хадавэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+Abs: хадавыˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+Abs: хадавы
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+Abs: хадавыˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+Abs: хадавэхэˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+Abs: хадавэхэˮна
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+Abs: хадавэхэт
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+Abs: хадавыˮмана
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавэв, хадавэми]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавэв, хадавэми]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавэн, хадавэни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [хадавэхэн, хадавэхэни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [хадавэхэнан, хадавэхэнани]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [хадавэхэдан, хадавэхэдани]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [хадавэвнан, хадавэвнани]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавэхэюн, хадавэхэюни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавэхэюн, хадавэхэюни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавэхэюн, хадавэхэюни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавын, хадавыни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавын, хадавыни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавыˮн, хадавыˮни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [хадавэхэˮн, хадавэхэˮни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [хадавэхэˮнан, хадавэхэˮнани]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [хадавэхэтан, хадавэхэтани]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [хадавыˮманан, хадавыˮманани]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хадавэр
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хадавэмд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хадавэнд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хадавэхэнд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хадавэхэнанд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хадавэхэданд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хадавэвнанд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хадавэхэюд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хадавэхэюд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хадавэхэют
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хадавыд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хадавыд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хадавыт
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хадавэхэт
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хадавэхэˮнат
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хадавэхэтат
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хадавыˮманат
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хадавэда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хадавэмда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хадавэнда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хадавэхэнда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хадавэхэнанда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хадавэхэданда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хадавэвнанда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хадавэхэюда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хадавэхэюда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хадавэхэюта
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хадавыда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хадавыда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хадавыта
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хадавэхэта
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хадавэхэˮната
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хадавэхэтата
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хадавыˮманата
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хадавэмиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадавэми
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хадавэмиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадавэми
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: хадавэниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадавэни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хадавэхэниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хадавэхэнаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэнани
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хадавэхэданиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэдани
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хадавэвнаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: хадавэвнани
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хадавэхэюниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэюни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хадавэхэюниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэюни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хадавэхэюниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэюни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хадавыниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадавыни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хадавыниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадавыни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хадавыˮниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадавыˮни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хадавэхэˮниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэˮни
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хадавэхэˮнаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэˮнани
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хадавэхэтаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: хадавэхэтани
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хадавыˮмананиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: хадавыˮманани
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хадавэриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хадавэмдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хадавэндиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хадавэхэндиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хадавэхэнандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хадавэхэдандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хадавэвнандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хадавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хадавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хадавэхэютиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хадавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хадавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хадавытиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хадавэхэтиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хадавэхэˮнатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хадавэхэтатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хадавыˮманатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хадавэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хадавэмдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хадавэндиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хадавэхэндиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хадавэхэнандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хадавэхэдандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хадавэвнандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хадавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хадавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хадавэхэютиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хадавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хадавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хадавытиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хадавэхэтиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хадавэхэˮнатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хадавэхэтатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хадавыˮманатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хадавэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хадавэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хадавэнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хадавэхэнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хадавэхэнанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хадавэхэданаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хадавэвнанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хадавэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хадавэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хадавэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хадавынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хадавынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хадавыˮнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хадавэхэˮнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хадавэхэˮнанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хадавэхэтанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хадавыˮмананаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хадавэраˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хадавэмдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хадавэндаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хадавэхэндаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хадавэхэнандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хадавэхэдандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хадавэвнандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хадавэхэюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хадавэхэюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хадавэхэютаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хадавыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хадавыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хадавытаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хадавэхэтаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хадавэхэˮнатаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хадавэхэтатаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хадавыˮманатаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хадавэдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хадавэмдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хадавэндоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хадавэхэндоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хадавэхэнандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хадавэхэдандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хадавэвнандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хадавэхэюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хадавэхэюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хадавэхэютоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хадавыдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хадавыдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хадавытоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хадавэхэтоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хадавэхэˮнатоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хадавэхэтатоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хадавыˮманатоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Abs: хадавэд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавэдав, хадавэдув, хадавэдами, хадавэдми]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавэдав, хадавэдув, хадавэдами, хадавэдми]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавэдан, хадавэдани, хадавэдни]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хадавэдар
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хадавэдамд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хадавэданд
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [хадавэдада, хадавэдда]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хадавэдамда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хадавэданда
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [хадавэдамиʼ, хадавэдмиʼ]
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [хадавэдами, хадавэдми]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [хадавэдамиʼ, хадавэдмиʼ]
#     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [хадавэдами, хадавэдми]
     хадась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [хадавэданиʼ, хадавэдниʼ]
